dictionaries/he_IL/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  13749 Y 1
SFX  13749 ף פנן/64993 .
SFX  5588 Y 1
SFX  5588 ו זרנו/64993 .
SFX  5996 Y 1
SFX  5996 0 שותכם/64993 .
SFX  13001 Y 1
SFX  13001 ם מצת/64991 .
SFX  5506 Y 1
SFX  5506 0 עהו/64992 .
SFX  12234 Y 1
SFX  12234 0 ירן/64991 .
SFX  5724 Y 1
SFX  5724 0 ירן/64992 .
SFX  9560 Y 1
SFX  9560 0 ירן/64993 .
SFX  9520 Y 1
SFX  9520 0 טתוך/64992 .
SFX  12017 Y 1
SFX  12017 0 יבינו/64991 .
SFX  13775 Y 1
SFX  13775 0 יבינו/64992 .
SFX  13273 Y 1
SFX  13273 ע פי/64991 .
SFX  10559 Y 1
SFX  10559 0 וניתכם/64993 .
SFX  10554 Y 1
SFX  10554 0 וניותיה/64993 .
SFX  13656 Y 1
SFX  13656 ע פי/64992 .
SFX  12468 Y 1
SFX  12468 0 יבינו/64993 .
SFX  10173 Y 1
SFX  10173 0 ירן/64998 .
SFX  10638 Y 1
SFX  10638 0 יבינו/64994 .
SFX  10524 Y 1
SFX  10524 ע פי/64993 .
SFX  10565 Y 1
SFX  10565 ע פי/64994 .
SFX  9964 Y 1
SFX  9964 ע פות/64991 .
SFX  10495 Y 1
SFX  10495 ע פי/64995 .
SFX  13939 Y 1
SFX  13939 ם מצם/64992 .
SFX  13113 Y 1
SFX  13113 י ליי/64991 .
SFX  11790 Y 1
SFX  11790 ע פי/64998 .
SFX  13847 Y 1
SFX  13847 ה ולי/64992 .
SFX  10579 Y 1
SFX  10579 ע פות/64996 .
SFX  6374 Y 1
SFX  6374 י ליי/64993 .
SFX  11337 Y 1
SFX  11337 ם מצם/64998 .
SFX  7887 Y 1
SFX  7887 ט ידכן/64992 .
SFX  9141 Y 1
SFX  9141 0 רנו/64991 .
SFX  5057 Y 1
SFX  5057 0 רנו/64992 .
SFX  5456 Y 1
SFX  5456 0 רנו/64993 .
SFX  13375 Y 1
SFX  13375 ן רות/64991 .
SFX  10365 Y 1
SFX  10365 0 רנו/64998 .
SFX  9106 Y 1
SFX  9106 0 סיכם/64991 .
SFX  13675 Y 1
SFX  13675 0 סיכם/64992 .
SFX  6765 Y 1
SFX  6765 0 רנו/64999 .
SFX  9299 Y 1
SFX  9299 ן נה/64991 .
SFX  5296 Y 1
SFX  5296 0 סיכם/64993 .
SFX  9992 Y 1
SFX  9992 ן נה/64992 .
SFX  6602 Y 1
SFX  6602 ן נה/64993 .
SFX  5637 Y 1
SFX  5637 0 יים/64991 .
SFX  13319 Y 1
SFX  13319 0 יים/64992 .
SFX  8561 Y 1
SFX  8561 ן נה/64994 .
SFX  13295 Y 1
SFX  13295 ן נק/64992 .
SFX  10379 Y 1
SFX  10379 ן נה/64995 .
SFX  9885 Y 1
SFX  9885 0 יים/64993 .
SFX  6518 Y 1
SFX  6518 0 כת/64991 .
SFX  12673 Y 1
SFX  12673 0 יטם/64991 .
SFX  8337 Y 1
SFX  8337 0 כת/64992 .
SFX  8005 Y 1
SFX  8005 0 כת/64993 .
SFX  5616 Y 1
SFX  5616 0 יטם/64992 .
SFX  10692 Y 1
SFX  10692 ן נה/64999 .
SFX  9425 Y 1
SFX  9425 0 יטם/64993 .
SFX  12569 Y 1
SFX  12569 ד ידכן/64991 .
SFX  7377 Y 1
SFX  7377 ד ידכן/64992 .
SFX  12794 Y 1
SFX  12794 0 ויו/64991 .
SFX  9915 Y 1
SFX  9915 ד ידכן/64993 .
SFX  10200 Y 1
SFX  10200 0 יטם/64998 .
SFX  6754 Y 1
SFX  6754 0 ויו/64993 .
SFX  12721 Y 1
SFX  12721 0 נע/64991 .
SFX  6621 Y 1
SFX  6621 0 נע/64992 .
SFX  11415 Y 1
SFX  11415 0 נע/64993 .
SFX  9293 Y 1
SFX  9293 ד ידכן/64998 .
SFX  13196 Y 1
SFX  13196 0 וקנו/64991 .
SFX  8249 Y 1
SFX  8249 0 עכם/64991 .
SFX  8084 Y 1
SFX  8084 0 וקנו/64992 .
SFX  5592 Y 1
SFX  5592 ו זרכם/64993 .
SFX  8492 Y 1
SFX  8492 0 וקנו/64993 .
SFX  5485 Y 1
SFX  5485 0 עכם/64992 .
SFX  7243 Y 1
SFX  7243 0 עכם/64993 .
SFX  9085 Y 1
SFX  9085 0 קיהם/64991 .
SFX  11921 Y 1
SFX  11921 0 גל/64991 .
SFX  6577 Y 1
SFX  6577 0 ולוגי/64991 .
SFX  7479 Y 1
SFX  7479 0 קיהם/64993 .
SFX  5816 Y 1
SFX  5816 0 גל/64992 .
SFX  10978 Y 1
SFX  10978 0 גל/64993 .
SFX  10153 Y 1
SFX  10153 0 קונו/64992 .
SFX  8212 Y 1
SFX  8212 ל נם/64991 .
SFX  11465 Y 1
SFX  11465 0 וקנו/64999 .
SFX  8667 Y 1
SFX  8667 0 עכם/64998 .
SFX  5011 Y 1
SFX  5011 ל נם/64992 .
SFX  6255 Y 1
SFX  6255 0 זיהם/64991 .
SFX  7105 Y 1
SFX  7105 0 קונו/64993 .
SFX  13476 Y 1
SFX  13476 0 קונו/64994 .
SFX  6192 Y 1
SFX  6192 ל נם/64993 .
SFX  12657 Y 1
SFX  12657 0 עד/64991 .
SFX  5790 Y 1
SFX  5790 0 זיהם/64993 .
SFX  10680 Y 1
SFX  10680 0 בנוה/64992 .
SFX  6583 Y 1
SFX  6583 0 עד/64992 .
SFX  13180 Y 1
SFX  13180 ם פף/64991 .
SFX  5566 Y 1
SFX  5566 0 עד/64993 .
SFX  8137 Y 1
SFX  8137 ם פף/64992 .
SFX  12198 Y 1
SFX  12198 0 יחם/64991 .
SFX  9366 Y 1
SFX  9366 ל נם/64998 .
SFX  11573 Y 1
SFX  11573 0 ביהם/64991 .
SFX  8745 Y 1
SFX  8745 י מי/64991 .
SFX  5686 Y 1
SFX  5686 0 יחם/64992 .
SFX  13676 Y 1
SFX  13676 י מי/64992 .
SFX  10705 Y 1
SFX  10705 0 יחם/64993 .
SFX  10416 Y 1
SFX  10416 0 עד/64997 .
SFX  5288 Y 1
SFX  5288 0 ביהם/64993 .
SFX  6328 Y 1
SFX  6328 י מי/64993 .
SFX  8520 Y 1
SFX  8520 0 ריותיכם/64993 .
SFX  8564 Y 1
SFX  8564 י מי/64995 .
SFX  9271 Y 1
SFX  9271 0 מוכם/64992 .
SFX  6596 Y 1
SFX  6596 0 ינותו/64993 .
SFX  9432 Y 1
SFX  9432 0 יחם/64998 .
SFX  7575 Y 1
SFX  7575 0 צייתכן/64993 .
SFX  9896 Y 1
SFX  9896 ח יתי/64992 .
SFX  6910 Y 1
SFX  6910 ח יתי/64993 .
SFX  11164 Y 1
SFX  11164 ח יתי/64995 .
SFX  6588 Y 1
SFX  6588 0 ינות/64991 .
SFX  12863 Y 1
SFX  12863 י כינו/64991 .
SFX  12615 Y 1
SFX  12615 0 טיי/64991 .
SFX  7541 Y 1
SFX  7541 0 פויותיהן/64993 .
SFX  13826 Y 1
SFX  13826 י כינו/64992 .
SFX  12848 Y 1
SFX  12848 0 יקתן/64991 .
SFX  12147 Y 1
SFX  12147 י כינו/64993 .
SFX  9786 Y 1
SFX  9786 0 יקתן/64992 .
SFX  7780 Y 1
SFX  7780 0 טיי/64993 .
SFX  13445 Y 1
SFX  13445 0 יקתן/64993 .
SFX  7223 Y 1
SFX  7223 0 לי/64991 .
SFX  6054 Y 1
SFX  6054 0 ויותיכן/64993 .
SFX  13964 Y 1
SFX  13964 ח ידיה/64992 .
SFX  13504 Y 1
SFX  13504 0 לי/64992 .
SFX  5795 Y 1
SFX  5795 0 לי/64993 .
SFX  10090 Y 1
SFX  10090 0 לי/64995 .
SFX  13739 Y 1
SFX  13739 ץ צצי/64992 .
SFX  13792 Y 1
SFX  13792 0 לי/64999 .
SFX  13186 Y 1
SFX  13186 0 נננו/64991 .
SFX  8069 Y 1
SFX  8069 0 נננו/64992 .
SFX  8309 Y 1
SFX  8309 0 ימיה/64991 .
SFX  13832 Y 1
SFX  13832 0 ימיה/64992 .
SFX  7948 Y 1
SFX  7948 0 ימיה/64993 .
SFX  11003 Y 1
SFX  11003 0 נננו/64998 .
SFX  9714 Y 1
SFX  9714 0 ימיה/64994 .
SFX  12098 Y 1
SFX  12098 0 נן/64991 .
SFX  5448 Y 1
SFX  5448 0 נן/64992 .
SFX  5126 Y 1
SFX  5126 0 נן/64993 .
SFX  9272 Y 1
SFX  9272 0 מתהו/64992 .
SFX  13280 Y 1
SFX  13280 ן נע/64992 .
SFX  12362 Y 1
SFX  12362 0 גם/64991 .
SFX  6044 Y 1
SFX  6044 0 גם/64992 .
SFX  8660 Y 1
SFX  8660 0 נן/64998 .
SFX  8022 Y 1
SFX  8022 0 גם/64993 .
SFX  7047 Y 1
SFX  7047 0 נן/64999 .
SFX  6175 Y 1
SFX  6175 0 ייך/64991 .
SFX  11836 Y 1
SFX  11836 ח ידנו/64992 .
SFX  8124 Y 1
SFX  8124 0 ייך/64992 .
SFX  5341 Y 1
SFX  5341 0 ייך/64993 .
SFX  12260 Y 1
SFX  12260 0 ירתו/64991 .
SFX  10535 Y 1
SFX  10535 0 גם/64998 .
SFX  10759 Y 1
SFX  10759 0 יתיהו/64992 .
SFX  9578 Y 1
SFX  9578 0 ירתו/64992 .
SFX  13040 Y 1
SFX  13040 0 ירתו/64993 .
SFX  11407 Y 1
SFX  11407 ה ותכם/64998 .
SFX  9592 Y 1
SFX  9592 0 יתיהו/64994 .
SFX  13129 Y 1
SFX  13129 ט יטן/64991 .
SFX  7908 Y 1
SFX  7908 ט יטן/64992 .
SFX  10037 Y 1
SFX  10037 ט יטן/64993 .
SFX  13612 Y 1
SFX  13612 0 יטיני/64992 .
SFX  10591 Y 1
SFX  10591 0 דותי/64991 .
SFX  13285 Y 1
SFX  13285 0 חתי/64991 .
SFX  13064 Y 1
SFX  13064 ח יחתם/64991 .
SFX  9489 Y 1
SFX  9489 0 יטיני/64994 .
SFX  6778 Y 1
SFX  6778 0 דותי/64993 .
SFX  6200 Y 1
SFX  6200 0 חתי/64992 .
SFX  12631 Y 1
SFX  12631 0 טותיכם/64991 .
SFX  9384 Y 1
SFX  9384 ח יחתם/64992 .
SFX  6524 Y 1
SFX  6524 0 חתי/64993 .
SFX  10800 Y 1
SFX  10800 ט יטן/64998 .
SFX  8003 Y 1
SFX  8003 0 כה/64991 .
SFX  5481 Y 1
SFX  5481 0 כה/64992 .
SFX  6456 Y 1
SFX  6456 0 טותיכם/64993 .
SFX  6402 Y 1
SFX  6402 0 יני/64991 .
SFX  5658 Y 1
SFX  5658 0 כה/64993 .
SFX  5928 Y 1
SFX  5928 0 יני/64992 .
SFX  12597 Y 1
SFX  12597 ד ירו/64991 .
SFX  11655 Y 1
SFX  11655 0 ירי/64991 .
SFX  8206 Y 1
SFX  8206 0 יני/64993 .
SFX  6845 Y 1
SFX  6845 0 יבהו/64992 .
SFX  13529 Y 1
SFX  13529 0 ירי/64992 .
SFX  12826 Y 1
SFX  12826 0 יאך/64991 .
SFX  12380 Y 1
SFX  12380 0 גתכם/64991 .
SFX  11820 Y 1
SFX  11820 ד ירו/64992 .
SFX  5120 Y 1
SFX  5120 0 יני/64994 .
SFX  11490 Y 1
SFX  11490 0 ירי/64993 .
SFX  10938 Y 1
SFX  10938 0 גתכם/64992 .
SFX  7816 Y 1
SFX  7816 0 יני/64995 .
SFX  6811 Y 1
SFX  6811 0 יאך/64992 .
SFX  10225 Y 1
SFX  10225 0 יאך/64993 .
SFX  8041 Y 1
SFX  8041 0 גתכם/64993 .
SFX  10385 Y 1
SFX  10385 0 כה/64998 .
SFX  9558 Y 1
SFX  9558 0 ירי/64995 .
SFX  13088 Y 1
SFX  13088 0 וגו/64991 .
SFX  11611 Y 1
SFX  11611 0 כה/64999 .
SFX  12444 Y 1
SFX  12444 0 יעתה/64991 .
SFX  10881 Y 1
SFX  10881 0 יני/64999 .
SFX  9461 Y 1
SFX  9461 0 יעתה/64992 .
SFX  8928 Y 1
SFX  8928 0 דנוכם/64992 .
SFX  8179 Y 1
SFX  8179 0 וגו/64993 .
SFX  10661 Y 1
SFX  10661 0 יאך/64998 .
SFX  10599 Y 1
SFX  10599 ד ירו/64999 .
SFX  8701 Y 1
SFX  8701 0 יעתה/64993 .
SFX  11676 Y 1
SFX  11676 ם ניה/64991 .
SFX  6969 Y 1
SFX  6969 0 וטים/64991 .
SFX  13907 Y 1
SFX  13907 0 וטים/64992 .
SFX  12094 Y 1
SFX  12094 0 ישת/64991 .
SFX  11033 Y 1
SFX  11033 0 וגו/64999 .
SFX  12310 Y 1
SFX  12310 0 ישת/64993 .
SFX  6231 Y 1
SFX  6231 0 זתכם/64991 .
SFX  10104 Y 1
SFX  10104 0 זתכם/64992 .
SFX  7921 Y 1
SFX  7921 0 לויותינו/64993 .
SFX  6737 Y 1
SFX  6737 0 זתכם/64993 .
SFX  12216 Y 1
SFX  12216 0 יחתכן/64991 .
SFX  10722 Y 1
SFX  10722 0 יחתכן/64992 .
SFX  6549 Y 1
SFX  6549 0 גות/64991 .
SFX  5964 Y 1
SFX  5964 0 בה/64991 .
SFX  5712 Y 1
SFX  5712 0 בה/64992 .
SFX  5230 Y 1
SFX  5230 0 בה/64993 .
SFX  12873 Y 1
SFX  12873 ל נכם/64991 .
SFX  10409 Y 1
SFX  10409 0 גות/64996 .
SFX  6646 Y 1
SFX  6646 ל נכם/64992 .
SFX  8979 Y 1
SFX  8979 0 איותיהם/64993 .
SFX  6826 Y 1
SFX  6826 ל נכם/64993 .
SFX  12528 Y 1
SFX  12528 0 יפה/64991 .
SFX  10368 Y 1
SFX  10368 0 בה/64998 .
SFX  8997 Y 1
SFX  8997 0 בה/64999 .
SFX  6012 Y 1
SFX  6012 0 יפה/64992 .
SFX  10113 Y 1
SFX  10113 0 יפה/64993 .
SFX  9369 Y 1
SFX  9369 ל נכם/64998 .
SFX  6976 Y 1
SFX  6976 0 ליותיו/64993 .
SFX  7315 Y 1
SFX  7315 0 רתונו/64992 .
SFX  10163 Y 1
SFX  10163 0 יפה/64999 .
SFX  12499 Y 1
SFX  12499 0 ידיכן/64991 .
SFX  13758 Y 1
SFX  13758 0 ידיכן/64992 .
SFX  12960 Y 1
SFX  12960 י כלו/64991 .
SFX  12086 Y 1
SFX  12086 0 ידיכן/64993 .
SFX  13878 Y 1
SFX  13878 י כלו/64992 .
SFX  8207 Y 1
SFX  8207 0 ינים/64991 .
SFX  13887 Y 1
SFX  13887 0 ינים/64992 .
SFX  12607 Y 1
SFX  12607 0 טן/64991 .
SFX  7111 Y 1
SFX  7111 0 טן/64992 .
SFX  7774 Y 1
SFX  7774 0 טן/64993 .
SFX  11055 Y 1
SFX  11055 י כלו/64999 .
SFX  10479 Y 1
SFX  10479 0 טן/64998 .
SFX  8375 Y 1
SFX  8375 0 אייך/64991 .
SFX  13942 Y 1
SFX  13942 0 טן/64999 .
SFX  6429 Y 1
SFX  6429 0 ניתך/64993 .
SFX  8119 Y 1
SFX  8119 0 אייך/64993 .
SFX  9781 Y 1
SFX  9781 0 קנוכם/64992 .
SFX  6262 Y 1
SFX  6262 ל מם/64991 .
SFX  7751 Y 1
SFX  7751 ל מם/64992 .
SFX  7756 Y 1
SFX  7756 ל מם/64993 .
SFX  13632 Y 1
SFX  13632 ו ירן/64992 .
SFX  10962 Y 1
SFX  10962 0 גוני/64992 .
SFX  12301 Y 1
SFX  12301 0 ילותיכם/64991 .
SFX  8995 Y 1
SFX  8995 0 גוני/64993 .
SFX  8422 Y 1
SFX  8422 ל מם/64998 .
SFX  7929 Y 1
SFX  7929 0 לויותיהם/64993 .
SFX  8772 Y 1
SFX  8772 0 ילותיכם/64993 .
SFX  11844 Y 1
SFX  11844 ח ידני/64992 .
SFX  12654 Y 1
SFX  12654 0 כנת/64991 .
SFX  11221 Y 1
SFX  11221 0 אתי/64991 .
SFX  8132 Y 1
SFX  8132 0 כנת/64992 .
SFX  8373 Y 1
SFX  8373 0 אתי/64992 .
SFX  7601 Y 1
SFX  7601 0 צות/64991 .
SFX  8609 Y 1
SFX  8609 0 אתי/64993 .
SFX  7893 Y 1
SFX  7893 0 פר/64991 .
SFX  5771 Y 1
SFX  5771 0 פר/64992 .
SFX  12027 Y 1
SFX  12027 0 יביהן/64991 .
SFX  10977 Y 1
SFX  10977 0 פר/64993 .
SFX  6705 Y 1
SFX  6705 ח ימהו/64992 .
SFX  12474 Y 1
SFX  12474 0 יביהן/64993 .
SFX  13304 Y 1
SFX  13304 0 ורתן/64992 .
SFX  8817 Y 1
SFX  8817 0 לתום/64992 .
SFX  8061 Y 1
SFX  8061 0 ורתן/64993 .
SFX  13961 Y 1
SFX  13961 ח ידי/64992 .
SFX  6162 Y 1
SFX  6162 0 ו/64991 .
SFX  5015 Y 1
SFX  5015 0 ו/64992 .
SFX  5078 Y 1
SFX  5078 0 ו/64993 .
SFX  7557 Y 1
SFX  7557 0 ו/64994 .
SFX  13389 Y 1
SFX  13389 0 יפוני/64991 .
SFX  11515 Y 1
SFX  11515 ץ צות/64991 .
SFX  6794 Y 1
SFX  6794 0 ו/64995 .
SFX  11956 Y 1
SFX  11956 0 ו/64996 .
SFX  10135 Y 1
SFX  10135 0 יפוני/64992 .
SFX  13928 Y 1
SFX  13928 0 יפוני/64993 .
SFX  6709 Y 1
SFX  6709 0 ו/64997 .
SFX  11486 Y 1
SFX  11486 ף פן/64991 .
SFX  8068 Y 1
SFX  8068 0 ו/64998 .
SFX  5841 Y 1
SFX  5841 0 ו/64999 .
SFX  5038 Y 1
SFX  5038 ף פן/64992 .
SFX  7219 Y 1
SFX  7219 ף פן/64993 .
SFX  11635 Y 1
SFX  11635 0 וביהן/64993 .
SFX  8278 Y 1
SFX  8278 0 עתה/64991 .
SFX  9999 Y 1
SFX  9999 0 עתה/64992 .
SFX  8539 Y 1
SFX  8539 0 עתה/64993 .
SFX  7715 Y 1
SFX  7715 ף פן/64998 .
SFX  5357 Y 1
SFX  5357 ה וק/64992 .
SFX  11235 Y 1
SFX  11235 ח ילוני/64992 .
SFX  12192 Y 1
SFX  12192 0 חיו/64991 .
SFX  9731 Y 1
SFX  9731 0 ימוה/64992 .
SFX  11553 Y 1
SFX  11553 0 בו/64991 .
